Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-610
Project, defined.

As used in sections 3-611 to 3-621, project shall mean any airport operated by the authority, including all real and personal property, structures, machinery, equipment, and appurtenances or facilities which are part of such airport or used or useful in connection therewith either as ground facilities for the convenience of handling aviation equipment, passengers, and freight, or as part of aviation, air navigation, and air safety operation.

Laws 1969, c. 141, § 10, p. 650.